District of Columbia statutes.
29-705.02

Liability for contributions.

(a)

A partner’s obligation to contribute money or other property or other benefit to, or to perform services for, a limited partnership shall not be excused by the partner’s death, disability, or other inability to perform personally.

(b)

If a partner does not make a promised non-monetary contribution, the partner shall be obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute money equal to that portion of the value, as stated in the required information, of the stated contribution which has not been made.

(c)

The obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of all partners. A creditor of a limited partnership which extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subsection (a) of this section, without notice of any compromise under this subsection, may enforce the original obligation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(6)(B), 59 DCR 13171

History

This section is referenced in § 29-707.02.

Section References

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “contributions” for “contribution” in the section heading.

Effect of Amendments

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 502 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes